Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 1. Titles to Manufactured Homes

38-29-101.
Short title.

This part 1 shall be known and may be cited as the “Titles to Manufactured Homes Act”.

History.

Source:
L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1448, § 1, effective June 15.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 442, § 1, effective July 1.

38-29-102.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Authorized agent” means the county clerk and recorder in each of the counties of the state, except in the city and county of Denver, and therein the manager of revenue, or such other official of the city and county of Denver as may be appointed by the mayor to perform functions related to the registration of manufactured homes, is the authorized agent.

(1.5)

“Clerk and recorder” means the clerk and recorder of any county or city and county in the state of Colorado.

“Dealer” means any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or association licensed under the laws of this state to engage in the business of buying, selling, exchanging, or otherwise trading in manufactured homes.

“Department” means the department of revenue.

“Director” means the executive director of the department of revenue.

“Home” means any manufactured home as defined in subsection (6) of this section.

“Manufactured home” means a preconstructed building unit or combination of preconstructed building units that is constructed in compliance with the federal manufactured home construction safety standard, as defined in section 24-32-3302 13, C.R.S. “Manufactured home” shall also include a mobile home, as defined in section 24-32-3302 (24), C.R.S.

“Manufacturer” means a person, firm, partnership, corporation, or association engaged in the manufacture of new manufactured homes.

Repealed.

“Mortgages” or “mortgage” or “chattel mortgage” means chattel mortgages, conditional sales contracts, or any other like instrument intended to operate as a mortgage or to create a lien on a manufactured home as security for an undertaking of the owner thereof or some other person; except that, as used in part 2 of this article, “mortgage” also includes mortgages, deeds of trust, and other liens on real property.

“Owner” means any person, association of persons, firm, or corporation in whose name the title to a manufactured home is registered.

“Person” means a natural person, association of persons, firm, partnership, or corporation.

“State” includes the territories and the federal districts of the United States.

“Verification of application form” means the form generated by an authorized agent upon receipt of a properly completed application for title submitted in accordance with section 38-29-107.

History.

Source:
L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1448, § 1, effective June 15.

L. 89:

(6) amended and (8) repealed, pp. 729, 731, §§ 35, 40, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 562, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1.5) and (13) added and (6) and (9) amended, p. 442, § 2, effective July 1.

38-29-103.
Application.

The provisions of this article shall apply to manufactured homes as defined in section 38-29-102 (6).

History.

Source:
L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1449, § 1, effective June 15.

38-29-104.
Administration.

The director is charged with the duty of administering this part 1. For that purpose he or she is vested with the power to make such reasonable rules, prepare, prescribe, and require the use of such forms, and provide such procedures as may be reasonably necessary or essential to the efficient administration of this part 1.

History.

Source:
L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1449, § 1, effective June 15.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 443, § 3, effective July 1.

38-29-105.
Authorized agents.

The county clerk and recorder in each of the counties of the state, except in the city and county of Denver the manager of revenue or such other official of the city and county of Denver as may be appointed by the mayor to perform functions related to the registration of manufactured homes, is designated to be the authorized agent of the director and, under the direction of the director, is charged with the administration of the terms and provisions of this article and the rules that may from time to time be adopted for the administration thereof in the county in which such authorized agent holds office.

History.

Source:
L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1449, § 1, effective June 15.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 562, § 2, effective July 1.

38-29-106.
Sale or transfer of manufactured home.

Except as provided in section 38-29-114, no person shall sell or otherwise transfer a manufactured home to a purchaser or transferee thereof without delivering to such purchaser or transferee the certificate of title to such home, duly transferred in the manner prescribed in section 38-29-112, and no purchaser or transferee shall acquire any right, title, or interest in and to a manufactured home purchased by him unless and until he obtains from the transferor the certificate of title thereto, duly transferred to him in accordance with the provisions of this article.

History.

Source:
L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1449, § 1, effective June 15.

38-29-107.
Applications for certificates of title.

In any case under the provisions of this article wherein a person who is entitled to a certificate of title to a manufactured home is required to make formal application to the director therefor, such applicant shall make application upon a form provided by the director in which appears a description of the manufactured home, including the manufacturer and model thereof, the manufacturer’s number, the date on which said manufactured home was first sold by the dealer or manufacturer thereof to the initial user thereof, and a description of any other distinguishing mark, number, or symbol placed on said home by the manufacturer thereof for identification purposes, as may by rule be required by the director. Such application shall also show the applicant’s source of title and the new or resale price of said manufactured home, whichever is applicable, paid by such applicant and shall include a description of all known mortgages and liens upon said manufactured home, each including the name of the legal holder thereof, the amount originally secured, the amount outstanding on the obligation secured at the time such application is made, the name of the county or city and county and state in which such mortgage or lien instrument is recorded or filed, and proof of the fact that no property taxes for previous years are due on such manufactured home. Such proof shall be a certificate of taxes, or an authentication of paid ad valorem taxes, issued by the county treasurer of the county in which the manufactured home is located. Such application shall be affirmed by a statement signed by the applicant and shall contain or be accompanied by a written declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury in the second degree, as defined in section 18-8-503, C.R.S.

In any case in which the manufactured home was affixed to the ground prior to July 1, 2008, and a certificate of permanent location was not filed and recorded, a person who is entitled to a certificate of title to a manufactured home shall make formal application to the director upon a form provided by the director. As part of the application, in addition to any information required pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the applicant shall provide an affidavit of real property, a statement that the identification number has been verified pursuant to section 38-29-122 (3)(a), a certificate of removal, and a copy of all deeds recorded since the home was affixed to the ground. The director shall accept these documents as sufficient evidence of the applicant’s proof of ownership of the manufactured home.

In any case in which the manufactured home was affixed to the ground after July 1, 2008, and a certificate of permanent location was filed and recorded, a person who is entitled to a certificate of title to a manufactured home shall make formal application to the director upon a form provided by the director. As part of the application, in addition to any information required pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the applicant shall provide a copy of the recorded certificate of permanent location, a certificate of removal, a statement that the identification number has been verified pursuant to section 38-29-122 (3)(a), and a copy of all deeds recorded since the home was affixed to the ground. The director shall accept these documents as sufficient evidence of the applicant’s proof of ownership of the manufactured home.

In any case in which a manufactured home occupies real property subject to a long-term lease that has an express term of at least ten years, the manufactured home was affixed to the ground after July 1, 2008, and a certificate of permanent location was filed and recorded, a person who is entitled to a certificate of title to a manufactured home shall make formal application to the director upon a form provided by the director. As part of the application, in addition to any information required pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the applicant shall provide a copy of the recorded certificate of permanent location, a statement that the identification number has been verified pursuant to section 38-29-122 (3)(a), and a copy of the recorded long-term lease. The director shall accept these documents as sufficient evidence of the applicant’s proof of ownership of the manufactured home.

History.

Source:
L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1449, § 1, effective June 15.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1570, § 2, effective January 1, 1990.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 1687, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1696, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-040), ch. 9, p. 63, § 3, effective July 1.

38-29-108.
Where application for certificates of title made - procedure.

An application for a certificate of title upon the sale, transfer, or movement into the state of any manufactured home that does not become real property pursuant to section 38-29-114 (2) or section 38-29-117 (6) shall be directed to the director and filed with the authorized agent of the county or city or city and county in which such manufactured home is to be located. Upon sale or transfer, an application for a certificate of title on a manufactured home shall be made within forty-five days of the receipt of a manufacturer’s certificate or statement of origin or its equivalent. The authorized agents shall forward copies of all such applications to the county assessor. Any person, other than an individual selling a manufactured home used as his residence, who receives a commission or other valuable consideration for the transfer or sale of a manufactured home shall fulfill the application and notice requirements of this subsection (1).

Repealed.

History.

Source:
L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1450, § 1, effective June 15.

L. 84:

(2) repealed, p. 978, § 1, effective March 29.

L. 89:

(1) amended, p. 729, § 36, effective July 1.

38-29-109.
Director may refuse certificate, when.

The director shall use reasonable diligence in ascertaining whether the facts stated in any application and facts contained in other documents submitted to him with said application are true and, in appropriate cases, may require the applicant to furnish other and additional information regarding his ownership of the manufactured home and his right to have issued to him a certificate of title therefor. He may refuse to issue a certificate of title to such home if from his investigation he determines that the applicant is not entitled thereto.

History.

Source:
L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1450, § 1, effective June 15.

38-29-110.
Certificates of title - contents.

All certificates of title to manufactured homes issued under the provisions of this article shall be subscribed by the director, or by some duly authorized officer or employee in the department in the name, place, and stead of the director, to which shall be affixed the seal of the department. Such certificate shall be mailed to the applicant, except as provided in section 38-29-111, and information of the facts therein appearing and concerning the issuance thereof shall be retained by the director and appropriately indexed and filed in his office. The certificate shall be in such form as the director may prescribe and shall contain, in addition to other information which he may by rule from time to time require, the manufacturer and model of the manufactured home for which said certificate is issued, the date on which said home therein described was first sold by the manufacturer or dealer to the initial user thereof, where such information is available, together with the serial number thereof, if any, and a description of such other marks or symbols as may be placed upon the home by the manufacturer thereof for identification purposes.

Beginning January 1, 1983, there shall be issued a distinctive certificate of title identifying the home as a manufactured home. Any person in whose name a certificate of title to a mobile home, as defined in section 38-29-102 (8), was issued prior to January 1, 1983, and which title is free and clear of all encumbrances, may apply to the director or one of his authorized agents for a distinctive manufactured home certificate of title, accompanied by the fee required in section 38-29-138 to be paid for the issuance of a duplicate certificate of title; whereupon, a distinctive certificate of title shall be issued and disposition thereof made as required in this article.

History.

Source:
L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1450, § 1, effective June 15.

38-29-111.
Disposition of certificates of title.

All certificates of title issued by the director shall be disposed of by him in the following manner:

If it appears from the records in the director’s office and from an examination of the certificate of title that the manufactured home therein described is not subject to a mortgage filed subsequent to August 1, 1949, or if such home is encumbered by a mortgage filed in any county of a state other than the state of Colorado, the certificate of title shall be delivered to the person who therein appears to be the owner of the home described, or such certificate shall be mailed to the owner thereof at his address as the same may appear in the application, the certificate of title, or other records in the director’s office.

If it appears from the records in the office of the director and from the certificate of title that the manufactured home therein described is subject to one or more mortgages filed subsequent to August 1, 1949, the director shall deliver the certificate of title issued by him to the mortgagee named therein or the holder thereof whose mortgage was first filed in the office of an authorized agent or shall mail the same to such mortgagee or holder at his address as the same appears in the certificate of title to said manufactured home.

History.

Source:
L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1451, § 1, effective June 15.

38-29-112.
Certificate of title - transfer.

Upon the sale or transfer of a manufactured home for which a certificate of title has been issued, the person in whose name said certificate of title is registered, if he is other than a dealer, shall, in his own person or by his duly authorized agent or attorney, execute a formal transfer of the home described in the certificate, which transfer shall be affirmed by a statement signed by the person in whose name said certificate of title is registered or by his duly authorized agent or attorney and shall contain or be accompanied by a written declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury in the second degree, as defined in section 18-8-503, C.R.S. The purchaser or transferee, within thirty days thereafter, shall present such certificate, duly transferred, together with his application for a new certificate of title to the director or one of his authorized agents, accompanied by the fee required in section 38-29-138 to be paid for the issuance of a new certificate of title; whereupon, a new certificate of title shall be issued and disposition thereof made as required in this article.

(1.3)

Prior to the sale or transfer of a manufactured home for which a certificate of title has been issued, a holder of a mortgage that is the legal holder of certificate of title shall provide a copy of the certificate of title to any title insurance agent, title insurance company, or financial institution requesting information related to the payoff of the mortgage within fourteen days of the request.

(1.5)

The purchaser or transferee of a manufactured home that becomes permanently affixed at an existing site or is transported to a site and is permanently affixed to the ground so that it is no longer capable of being drawn over the public highways shall present a certificate of transfer as required in subsection (1) of this section, together with his or her application for purging a manufactured home title and a certificate of permanent location, to the authorized agent of the county or city or city and county in which such manufactured home is located. The manufactured home shall become real property upon the filing and recording of the certificate of permanent location in accordance with section 38-29-202. The provisions of articles 30 to 44 of this title and of any other law of this state shall be applicable to manufactured homes that have become real property pursuant to this subsection (1.5) and to instruments creating, disposing of, or otherwise affecting such real property wherever such provisions would be applicable to estates, rights, and interests in land or to instruments creating, disposing of, or otherwise affecting estates, rights, and interest in land. The manufactured home for which a Colorado certificate of title has been issued shall continue to be valued and taxed separately from the land on which it sits until such time that the manufactured home becomes real property pursuant to this subsection (1.5).

(1.7)

If the conditions set forth in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1.7) are met, the legal holder of the certificate of title, within forty-five days, shall deliver to the title insurance agent who is the settlement agent related to the sale of the manufactured home the certificate of title or evidence that the holder has lost the certificate of title and requested a duplicate from the department. The holder shall mail or otherwise deliver the duplicate certificate of title to the title insurance agent within five business days of receipt from the department. Upon receipt from the holder, the title insurance agent shall present the certificate of title to the person in whose name the certificate of title is issued or his or her authorized agent or attorney to allow such person to execute a formal transfer as required by subsection (1) of this section.

The provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1.7) shall apply if:

A title insurance agent acts as a settlement agent related to the sale of a manufactured home;

The manufactured home that is sold is the subject of one or more mortgages that have been filed pursuant to section 38-29-128; and

All holders of a mortgage on the manufactured home that have been filed pursuant to section 38-29-128 have been paid in full from the proceeds of the sale.

[Editor’s note: This version of subsection (2) is effective until March 1, 2022.] Any person who violates any of the provisions of subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars nor more than one thousand dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than ten days nor more than six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(2)

[

Editor’s note: This version of subsection (2) is effective March 1, 2022.

]

Any person who violates any of the provisions of subsection (1) of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (1.3) or (1.7) of this section shall be liable to an injured person for any actual economic damages caused by the violation, to be recovered in a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction.

History.

Source:
L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1451, § 1, effective June 15.

L. 89:

(1.5) added, p. 729, § 37, effective July 1; (1) amended, p. 1571, § 3, effective January 1, 1990.

L. 91:

(2) amended, p. 1696, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1.3), (1.7), and (3) added and (1.5) amended, p. 866, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2008:

(1.5) amended, p. 443, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3292, § 682, effective March 1, 2022.

38-29-113.
Lost certificates of title.

Upon the loss in the mails of any certificate of title to a manufactured home and accompanying papers which may be sent by an authorized agent to the director and upon an appropriate application of the owner or other person entitled to such certificate of title directed to the authorized agent therefor, such certificate of title may be reissued bearing such notations respecting existing mortgages on the home therein described as the records of the authorized agent and of the director may indicate are unreleased and constitute an encumbrance upon the home, which certificate of title shall be issued without charge.

If the holder of any certificate of title loses, misplaces, or accidentally destroys any certificate of title to a manufactured home which he holds whether as the holder of a mortgage or as the owner of the home therein described, upon application therefor to the director, the director may issue a duplicate certificate of title as in other cases.

Upon the issuance of any duplicate certificate of title as provided in this section, the director shall note thereon every mortgage shown to be unreleased and the lien of which is in force and effect as may be disclosed by the records in his office and shall dispose of such certificate as in other cases.

History.

Source:
L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1452, § 1, effective June 15.

38-29-114.
New manufactured homes - bill of sale - certificate of title.

Upon the sale or transfer by a dealer of a new manufactured home, such dealer shall, upon the delivery thereof, make, execute, and deliver to the purchaser or transferee a good and sufficient bill of sale therefor, together with the manufacturer’s certificate or statement of origin or the filing of a mortgage by the holder of such mortgage pursuant to section 38-29-128. Said bill of sale shall be affirmed by a statement signed by such dealer and shall contain or be accompanied by a written declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury in the second degree, as defined in section 18-8-503, C.R.S., and the manufacturer’s certificate or statement of origin shall be notarized. Both the bill of sale and the manufacturer’s certificate or statement of origin shall be in such form as the director may prescribe, and shall contain, in addition to other information which he may by rule from time to time require, the manufacturer and model of the manufactured home so sold or transferred, the identification number placed upon the home by the manufacturer for identification purposes, the manufacturer’s suggested retail price or the retail delivered price, and the date of the sale or transfer thereof, together with a description of any mortgage thereon given to secure the purchase price or any part thereof. Upon presentation of such a bill of sale to the director or one of his authorized agents, a new certificate of title for the home therein described shall be issued and disposition thereof made as in other cases. The transfer of a manufactured home which has been used by a dealer for the purpose of demonstration to prospective customers shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this section.

Any purchaser of a new manufactured home that is transported to a site and permanently affixed to the ground so that it is no longer capable of being drawn over the public highways shall not be required to procure a certificate of title thereto as is otherwise required by this article. The purchaser shall file a certificate of permanent location along with the manufacturer’s certificate or statement of origin or its equivalent with the clerk and recorder for the county or city and county in which the new manufactured home is permanently affixed to the ground. The manufactured home shall become real property upon the filing and recording of such documents in accordance with section 38-29-202. The provisions of articles 30 to 44 of this title and of any other law of this state shall be applicable to manufactured homes that have become real property pursuant to this subsection (2) and to instruments creating, disposing of, or otherwise affecting such real property wherever such provisions would be applicable to estates, rights, and interests in land or to instruments creating, disposing of, or otherwise affecting estates, rights, and interests in land.

History.

Source:
L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1452, § 1, effective June 15.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 730, § 38, effective July 1; (1) amended, p. 1571, § 4, effective January 1, 1990.

L. 2008:

(2) amended, p. 443, § 5, effective July 1.

38-29-115.
Sale to dealers - certificate need not issue.

Upon the sale or transfer to a dealer of a manufactured home for which a Colorado certificate of title has been issued, formal transfer and delivery of the certificate of title thereto shall be made as in other cases; except that, so long as the home so sold or transferred remains in the dealer’s inventory for sale and for no other purpose, such dealer shall not be required to procure the issuance of a new certificate of title thereto as is otherwise required in this article.

History.

Source:
L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1452, § 1, effective June 15.

38-29-116.
Transfers by bequest, descent, law.

Upon the transfer of ownership of a manufactured home by a bequest contained in the will of the person in whose name the certificate of title is registered, or upon the descent and distribution upon the death intestate of the owner of such home, or upon the transfer by operation of law, as in proceedings in bankruptcy, insolvency, replevin, attachment, execution, or other judicial sale, or whenever such manufactured home is sold to satisfy storage or repair charges or repossession is had upon default in the performance of the terms of any mortgage, the director or an authorized agent, upon the surrender of the certificate of title, if the same is available, or upon presentation of such proof of ownership of such home as the director may reasonably require and upon presentation of an application for a certificate of title, as required in section 38-29-107, a new certificate of title may thereupon issue to the person shown by such evidence to be entitled thereto, and disposition shall be made as in other cases.

History.

Source:
L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1453, § 1, effective June 15.

38-29-117.
Certificates for manufactured homes registered in other states.

Whenever any resident of the state acquires the ownership of a manufactured home, located or to be located in the state of Colorado, by purchase, gift, or otherwise, for which a certificate of title has been issued under the laws of a state other than the state of Colorado, the person so acquiring such home upon acquiring the same shall make application to the director or his authorized agent for a certificate of title as in other cases.

If any dealer acquires the ownership by any lawful means whatsoever of a manufactured home, the title to which is registered under the laws of and in a state other than the state of Colorado, such dealer shall not be required to procure a Colorado certificate of title therefor so long as such home remains in the dealer’s inventory for sale and for no other purpose.

Upon the sale by a dealer of a manufactured home, the certificate of title to which was issued in a state other than Colorado, the dealer shall immediately deliver to the purchaser or transferee such certificate of title from a state other than Colorado duly and properly endorsed or assigned to the purchaser or transferee, together with the dealer’s statement, which shall contain or be accompanied by a written declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury in the second degree, as defined in section 18-8-503, C.R.S., and which shall set forth the following:

That such dealer has warranted and, by the execution of such affidavit, does warrant to the purchaser or transferee and all persons claiming or who shall claim under, by, or through the named purchaser or transferee that, at the time of the sale, transfer, and delivery thereof by the dealer, the manufactured home therein described was free and clear of all liens and mortgages, except those which might otherwise appear therein;

That the home therein described is not stolen; and

That such dealer had good, sure, and adequate title thereto and full right and authority to sell and transfer the same.

If the purchaser or transferee of the said manufactured home accompanies his application for a Colorado certificate of title to such home with the affidavit required by subsection (3) of this section and the duly endorsed or assigned certificate of title from a state other than Colorado, a Colorado certificate of title therefor may issue in the same manner as upon the sale or transfer of a manufactured home for which a Colorado certificate of title has been issued. Upon the issuance by the director of such certificate of title, he shall dispose of the same as provided in section 38-29-111.

Each dealer, on or before the fifteenth day of each month, on a form to be provided therefor, shall prepare, subscribe, and send to the auto theft division of the Colorado state patrol a complete description of each manufactured home held by such dealer during the preceding calendar month, or any part thereof, the certificate of title to which was issued by a state other than the state of Colorado or which home was registered under the laws of a state other than the state of Colorado and for which no application for a Colorado certificate of title has been made as provided in this section.

If any person acquires the ownership in a manufactured home for which a certificate of title has been issued under the laws of a state other than the state of Colorado and such home is transported to a site where it is permanently affixed to the ground so that it is no longer capable of being drawn over the public highways, such person shall not be required to procure a new certificate of title as is otherwise required by this article. The owner shall file a certificate of permanent location along with the certificate of title or the manufacturer’s certificate or statement of origin or its equivalent with the clerk and recorder for the county or city and county in which the manufactured home is permanently affixed to the ground. The manufactured home shall become real property upon the filing and recording of such documents in accordance with section 38-29-202. The provisions of articles 30 to 44 of this title and of any other law of this state shall be applicable to manufactured homes that have become real property pursuant to this subsection (6) and to instruments creating, disposing of, or otherwise affecting such real property wherever such provisions would be applicable to estates, rights, and interests in land or to instruments creating, disposing of, or otherwise affecting estates, rights, and interests in land.

History.

Source:
L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1453, § 1, effective June 15.

L. 89:

(6) added, p. 730, § 39, effective July 1; IP(3) amended, p. 1572, § 5, effective January 1, 1990.

L. 2008:

(6) amended, p. 444, § 6, effective July 1.

38-29-118.
Surrender and cancellation of certificate - purge of certificate - penalty for violation.

[Editor’s note: This version of subsection (1) is effective until March 1, 2022.] The owner of any manufactured home for which a Colorado certificate of title has been issued, upon the destruction or dismantling of said manufactured home or upon its being sold or otherwise disposed of as salvage, shall surrender his or her certificate of title thereto to the director with the request that such certificate of title be canceled and shall submit a certificate of destruction as set forth in section 38-29-204, and such certificate of title may thereupon be canceled. Any person who violates any of the provisions of this subsection (1) commits a class 1 petty offense and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-503, C.R.S.

(1)

[

Editor’s note: This version of subsection (1) is effective March 1, 2022.

]

The owner of any manufactured home for which a Colorado certificate of title has been issued, upon the destruction or dismantling of said manufactured home or upon its being sold or otherwise disposed of as salvage, shall surrender the owner’s certificate of title thereto to the director with the request that such certificate of title be canceled and shall submit a certificate of destruction as set forth in section 38-29-204, and such certificate of title may thereupon be canceled. Any person who violates any of the provisions of this subsection (1) commits a petty offense and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-503.

The owner of any manufactured home for which a Colorado certificate of title has been issued, upon its being permanently affixed to the ground so that it is no longer capable of being drawn over the public highways, shall surrender his or her certificate of title thereto and file with the authorized agent of the county or city and county in which such manufactured home is located a request for purging of the manufactured home title and a certificate of permanent location. The manufactured home shall become real property upon the filing and recording of the certificate of permanent location in accordance with section 38-29-202. The provisions of articles 30 to 44 of this title and of any other law of this state shall be applicable to manufactured homes that have become real property pursuant to this subsection (2) and to instruments creating, disposing of, or otherwise affecting such real property wherever such provisions would be applicable to estates, rights, and interests in land or to instruments creating, disposing of, or otherwise affecting estates, rights, and interests in land. The manufactured home for which a Colorado certificate of title has been issued shall continue to be valued and taxed separately from the land on which it sits until such time that the manufactured home becomes real property pursuant to this subsection (2).

History.

Source:
L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1454, § 1, effective June 15.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1554, § 339, effective October 1.

L. 2004:

(2) amended, p. 867, § 2, effective August 4.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 444, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3293, § 683, effective March 1, 2022.

38-29-119.
Furnishing bond for certificates.

In cases where the applicant for a certificate of title to a manufactured home is unable to provide the director or the director’s authorized agent with a certificate of title thereto, duly transferred to such applicant, a bill of sale therefor, or other evidence of the ownership thereof that satisfies the director of the right of the applicant to have a certificate of title issued to him or her, as provided in section 38-29-110, a certificate of title for such home may, nevertheless, be issued by the director upon the applicant therefor furnishing the director with his or her statement, in such form as the director may prescribe. There shall appear a recital of the facts and circumstances by which the applicant acquired the ownership and possession of such home, the source of the title thereto, and such other information as the director may require to enable him or her to determine what liens and encumbrances are outstanding against such manufactured home, if any, the date thereof, the amount secured thereby, where said liens or encumbrances are of public record, if they are of public record, and the right of the applicant to have a certificate of title issued to him or her. In situations involving an abandoned manufactured home located on an applicant’s real property, a copy of an order or judgment for possession obtained through a civil eviction proceeding, along with proof of efforts to notify, via certified mail, regular mail, and posting as otherwise required by law, the prior owner of the potential removal or transfer of title of the home, as well as proof of ownership of the real property on which the home is located, shall constitute sufficient evidence of the applicant’s right to a certificate of title for the home. The statement shall contain or be accompanied by a written declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury in the second degree, as defined in section 18-8-503, C.R.S., and shall accompany the formal application for the certificate as required in section 38-29-107.

If, from the affidavit of the applicant and such other evidence as may be submitted to him or her, the director finds that the applicant is the same person to whom a certificate of title for said home has previously been issued or that a certificate of title should be issued to the applicant, such certificate may be issued, in which event disposition thereof shall be made as in other cases. Except as provided by paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), no certificate of title shall be issued as provided in this section unless and until the applicant furnishes evidence of a savings account, deposit, or certificate of deposit meeting the requirements of section 11-35-101, C.R.S., or a good and sufficient bond with a corporate surety, to the people of the state of Colorado, in an amount equal to twice the actual value of the manufactured home according to the assessor’s records, as of the time application for the certificate is made, conditioned that the applicant and his or her surety shall hold harmless any person who suffers any loss or damage by reason of the issuance thereof.

An applicant shall not be required to furnish surety pursuant to this subsection (2) for a manufactured home that is twenty-five years old or older, if the applicant:

Provides proof that no property taxes for previous years are due for the manufactured home;

Has had a manufactured home identification inspection performed on the manufactured home; and

Presents the information required in subsection (1) of this section with the title application, accompanied by the written declaration set forth therein.

If any person suffers any loss or damage by reason of the issuance of the certificate of title as provided in this section, such person shall have a right of action against the applicant and, if applicable, the surety on his or her bond. The person who has suffered a loss or damage may proceed against the applicant, the surety, or against both the applicant and the surety.

History.

Source:
L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1454, § 1, effective June 15.

L. 89:

(1) amended, p. 1572, § 6, effective January 1, 1990.

L. 90:

(1) amended, p. 1840, § 18, effective May 31.

L. 2008:

(2) amended, p. 445, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-040), ch. 9, p. 64, § 4, effective July 1.